src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-tjaehppe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - tjähppe: # A_TJAEHPPE clever
    tjähppe+A+Attr: tjiehpes

    tjähppe+A+Sg+Nom: tjähppe
    tjähppe+A+Pl+Nom: tjiehpe

#    tjähppe+A+Sg+Gen: tjiehpe
#    tjähppe+A+Sg+Acc: tjiehpev
#    tjähppe+A+Sg+Ill: tjähppáj
#    tjähppe+A+Sg+Ine: tjiehpen
#    tjähppe+A+Sg+Ela: [tjiehpest, tjiehpes]
#    tjähppe+A+Sg+Com: [tjehpijn, tjehpijna]
#    tjähppe+A+Pl+Gen: tjehpij
#    tjähppe+A+Pl+Acc: tjehpijd
#    tjähppe+A+Pl+Ill: tjehpijda
#    tjähppe+A+Pl+Ine: tjehpijn
#    tjähppe+A+Pl+Ela: [tjehpijst, tjehpijs]
#    tjähppe+A+Pl+Com: [tjehpij, tjehpijgum]
##    tjähppe+A+Ess: tjähppen

    tjähppe+A+Comp+Attr: tjiehpep

    tjähppe+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjiehpep
    tjähppe+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: tjiehpeba

#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: tjiehpeba
#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: tjiehpebav
#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: tjiehpebij
#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: tjiehpebin
#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: [tjiehpebist, tjiehpebis]
#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Sg+Com: tjiehpebijn
#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: tjiehpebij
#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: tjiehpebijd
#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: tjiehpebijda
#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: tjiehpebijn
#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: [tjiehpebijst, tjiehpebijs]
#    tjähppe+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [tjiehpebij, tjiehpebijgum]
##    tjähppe+A+Comp+Ess: tjiehpeban

    tjähppe+A+Superl+Attr: tjiehpemus

    tjähppe+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjiehpemus
    tjähppe+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: tjiehpemusa

#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: tjiehpemusa
#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: tjiehpemusav
#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: tjiehpemusij
#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: tjiehpemusin
#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: [tjiehpemusist, tjiehpemusis]
#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Sg+Com: tjiehpemusijn
#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: tjiehpemusij
#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: tjiehpemusijd
#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: tjiehpemusijda
#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: tjiehpemusijn
#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: [tjiehpemusijst, tjiehpemusijs]
#    tjähppe+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [tjiehpemusij, tjiehpemusijgum]
##    tjähppe+A+Superl+Ess: tjiehpemusan
